Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-1715
Spousal support, defined.

Spousal support shall mean alimony or maintenance support for a spouse or former spouse if the provision for support is a part of an order, decree, or judgment which provides for child support and the child and spouse or former spouse are living in the same household.

Laws 1985, Second Spec. Sess., LB 7, § 35.